Vermont statutes. Title 24 Municipal and County Government
Chapter 125. Municipal Employees’ Retirement System of Vermont

§ 5051.
Definitions.

As used in this chapter:

“Accumulated contributions” means the sum of all the amounts deducted for Municipal Employees’ Retirement System purposes from the compensation of a member with interest thereon, as provided in subsection 5063(b) of this title.

“Actuarial equivalent” means a benefit of equal value under actuarial assumptions last adopted by the Retirement Board under subsection 5063a(h) of this title.

“Annuity” means annual payments for life actuarially derived from the accumulated contributions of a member.

“Average final compensation” (AFC) means:

For a Group A member, the average annual earnable compensation of a member during the five consecutive fiscal years beginning July 1 and ending June 30 of creditable service affording the highest average, or during all of the years of creditable service if fewer than five years. If the member’s highest five years of earnable compensation are the five years prior to separation of service and the member separates prior to the end of a fiscal year, the AFC shall be determined by adding all of the following:

The actual earnable compensation earned in the fiscal year of separation through the date of separation and the service credit to correspond with the last pay date.

The earnable compensation and service credit earned in the preceding four fiscal years.

The remaining service credit that is needed to complete the five full years, which shall be factored from the fiscal year preceding the four fiscal years described in subdivision (ii) of this subdivision (A). The earnable compensation associated with this remaining service credit shall be calculated by multiplying the annual earnable compensation reported by the remaining service credit that is needed.

For a Group B or C member, the term means the average annual earnable compensation of a member during the three consecutive fiscal years beginning on July 1 and ending on June 30 of creditable service affording the highest average, or during all of the years in his or her creditable service if fewer than three years. If the member’s highest three years of earnable compensation are the three years prior to separation of service and the member separates prior to the end of a fiscal year, the AFC shall be determined by adding all of the following:

The actual earnable compensation earned in the fiscal year of separation through the date of separation and the service credit to correspond with the last pay date.

The earnable compensation and service credit earned in the preceding two fiscal years.

The remaining service credit that is needed to complete the three full years, which shall be factored from the fiscal year preceding the two fiscal years described in subdivision (ii) of this subdivision (B). The earnable compensation associated with this remaining service credit shall be calculated by multiplying the annual earnable compensation reported by the remaining service credit that is needed.

For a Group D member, the term means the average annual earnable compensation of a member during the two consecutive fiscal years beginning on July 1 and ending on June 30 of creditable service affording the highest such average, or during all of the years in his or her creditable service if fewer than two years. If the member’s highest two years of earnable compensation are the two years prior to separation of service and the member separates prior to the end of a fiscal year, the AFC shall be determined by adding all of the following:

The actual earnable compensation earned in the fiscal year of separation through the date of separation and the service credit to correspond with the last pay date.

The earnable compensation and service credit earned in the preceding fiscal year.

The remaining service credit that is needed to complete the two full years, which shall be factored from the fiscal year preceding the fiscal year described in subdivision (ii) of this subdivision (C). The earnable compensation associated with this remaining service credit shall be calculated by multiplying the annual earnable compensation reported by the remaining service credit that is needed.

For purposes of determining average final compensation for a member who has accrued service in more than one group plan within the System, the highest consecutive years of earnings shall be based on the formulas outlined in subdivision (A), (B), or (C) of this subdivision (4) using the earnable compensation received while a member of the System.

“Beneficiary” means any person in receipt of a pension, an annuity, a retirement allowance, or other benefit as provided by this chapter.

“Board” means the Board of Trustees of the System provided for in section 5062 of this title to administer the System.

“Continuous service” means those periods of service as an employee with all employers, provided all of the following conditions are met:

The period of each employment was uninterrupted.

Not more than 30 days elapsed between termination of one period of employment and commencement of the next.

Each such termination occurred after the effective date of the System.

Each employer employing the employee after the effective date was a participant in the System during the period it employed the employee. Notwithstanding any other provisions, continuous service prior to the effective date of this plan shall commence on the most recent date of hire as an employee, but in no case shall the continuous service of an employee prior to the effective date of this plan be for a period longer than 20 years. If an employee does not withdraw his or her contributions, continuous service shall not be interrupted by:

an approved leave of absence; or

a departure from the Municipal Retirement System for a period of less than three years.

“Creditable service” means that period of continuous service subsequent to an employee joining the System and prior to his or her termination of service, during which an employee makes contributions. For those employees who join when first eligible, and whose employer joins on the effective date of this System, there shall be included as creditable service that period of continuous service as an employee prior to such effective date up to a maximum of 20 years with such employer. For those employees of employers who join on the effective date of the System, and who elect to join the System subsequent to the effective date, only the three years of continuous service immediately prior to joining the System shall be included as credited service. For those employees of employers who elect to purchase prior service credit in accordance with subsection 5054(e) of this title, there shall be included as creditable service that period of continuous service as an employee prior to the effective date of participation and allowed in accordance with the prior service purchase agreement but not in excess of 20 years. Creditable service shall also include that transferred under

3 V.S.A. § 495

.

“Earnable compensation” means the total amounts paid to an employee for his or her position. In cases where compensation includes maintenance, the Retirement Board shall fix the value of that part of the compensation not paid in money. Fees shall be counted as compensation.

“Employee” means the following persons employed on a regular basis by a school district or by a supervisory union for no fewer than 1,040 hours in a year and for no fewer than 30 hours a week for the school year, as defined in

16 V.S.A. § 1071

, or for no fewer than 1,040 hours in a year and for no fewer than 24 hours a week year-round; provided, however, that if a person who was employed on a regular basis by a school district as either a special education or transportation employee and who was transferred to and is working in a supervisory union in the same capacity pursuant to

16 V.S.A. § 261a(a)(6)

or (8)(E) and if that person is also employed on a regular basis by a school district within the supervisory union, then the person is an “employee” if these criteria are met by the combined hours worked for the supervisory union and school district. The term shall also mean persons employed on a regular basis by a municipality other than a school district for no fewer than 1,040 hours in a year and for no fewer than 24 hours per week, including persons employed in a library at least one-half of whose operating expenses are met by municipal funding:

“Group A member” means a person employed by a participating municipality who does not elect to become a Group B, C, or D member under section 5068 of this title or does not become a Group B or C member pursuant to a collective bargaining agreement.

“Group B member” means a person employed by a municipality who elects to become a Group B member under section 5068 of this title or becomes a Group B member pursuant to a collective bargaining agreement.

“Group C member” means a person employed by a municipality who elects to become a Group C member under section 5068 of this title or becomes a Group C member pursuant to a collective bargaining agreement.

“Group D member” means a person employed by a participating municipality who elects to become a Group D member under section 5068 of this title.

The Retirement Board shall determine any question as to whether a person is an employee as defined in this chapter.

“Employer” means a municipality, a library at least one-half of whose operating expenses are paid from municipal funds, or a supervisory union.

“Medical Board” means the board of physicians provided for in section 5062 of this title.

“Member” means any employee included in the membership of the Retirement System under section 5053 of this title.

“Municipality” means a city, town, county, incorporated village, fire district, consolidated water district, housing authority, union municipal district, school district, incorporated school district, union school district, or any of their instrumentalities. The Retirement Board shall determine any question as to whether an employer is eligible to participate in the System.

“Normal retirement date” means:

for Group A members, the first day of the calendar month next following the attainment of age 65 and the completion of five years of creditable service or age 55 and completion of 35 years of creditable service;

for Group B members, the first day of the calendar month next following the attainment of age 62 and the completion of five years of creditable service or age 55 and completion of 30 years of creditable service; and

for Group C and D members, the first day of the calendar month next following the attainment of age 55 and the completion of five years of creditable service.

“Pension” means annual payments for life derived from contributions by the State and municipality.

“Pension reserve” means the present value of all payments to be made on account of a pension, or benefit in lieu of a pension, computed at regular interest on the basis of tables last adopted by the Board.

“Regular interest” means interest at such rate or rates as may be established from time to time by the Board as provided in subsection 5063(b) of this title.

“Retirement” means withdrawal from active service with a retirement allowance granted under the provisions of this chapter.

“Retirement allowance” or “maximum allowance” means the sum of the annuity and the pension. All retirement allowances shall be payable in equal monthly installments except that when the retirement allowance is less than $20.00 per month it shall be payable on such basis as the Board may direct.

“Service” means service as an employee for which compensation is paid by an employer as defined in subdivision (11) of this section, service recognized under section 5054 of this title, or service prior to the effective date of the plan.

“System” means the Municipal Employees’ Retirement System of Vermont, as defined in section 5052 of this title.

“Fund” or “Vermont Municipal Retirement Fund” means the fund created by section 5064 of this title, which shall contain the assets of the Retirement System and from which shall be paid the benefits due to beneficiaries and the expenses of the Retirement System.

HISTORY:

Added

1973, No. 251

(Adj. Sess.), § 3; amended

1977, No. 164

(Adj. Sess.), § 3, eff. March 31, 1978;

1977, No. 205

(Adj. Sess.), § 1;

1983, No. 56

, § 1, eff. April 22, 1983;

1983, No. 128

(Adj. Sess.), § 1;

1987, No. 39

, § 1;

1987, No. 183

(Adj. Sess.), § 20, eff. May 7, 1988;

1989, No. 11

, §§ 1, 2;

1991, No. 233

(Adj. Sess.), § 1;

1999, No. 61

, § 1;

1999, No. 53

, §§ 8, 8a;

2005, No. 197

(Adj. Sess.), § 1;

2007, No. 13

, § 36;

2007, No. 13

7 (Adj. Sess.), § 8;

2009, No. 24

, §§ 7, 8;

2011, No. 156

(Adj. Sess.), § 24, eff. May 16, 2012;

2013, No. 22

, § 13;

2017, No. 165

(Adj. Sess.), § 25;

2019, No. 131

(Adj. Sess.), § 270;

2021, No. 20

, § 261.

§ 5052.
Name and date of establishment.

The date of establishment of the Retirement System shall be July 1, 1975. The System shall be known as the “Vermont Municipal Employees’ Retirement System”, and by such name all of its business shall be transacted, all of its assets invested, and all of its cash and securities and other property held in trust for the purpose for which received.

HISTORY:

Added

1973, No. 251

(Adj. Sess.), § 3; amended

2007, No. 13

, § 37.

§ 5053.
Members.

An employee of an employer who joins the Vermont Municipal Employees’ System may become a member of the System on the effective date of participation of said employer or at a later date if he or she has completed three or more years of continuous service as an employee. If an employee does not elect to join on the effective date of the System, he or she may join on the first of any subsequent month.

Any employee who is hired subsequent to the effective date of participation of his or her employer shall become a member of the System on the date the employee is hired.

A municipality may elect to join the Vermont Municipal Employees’ Retirement System by a vote of the legislative body of such municipality for all its employees or for employees of one or more groups of employees that have a similarity of interest, needs, and general conditions of employment or dates of hire, as determined by the legislative body and approved by the Board. The effective date of participation for such employers shall be designated by the Retirement Board. The vote by the legislative body of a municipality to join the Vermont Municipal Employees’ Retirement System shall be irrevocable.

The Retirement Board may, upon application of the legislative body and an employee, exempt individual employees from membership in the System, provided that the Board determines that the employee is participating in an alternative retirement system, including a retirement plan qualifying under Section 401(a) or 457 of the Internal Revenue Code, which better meets the retirement needs of the employee.

HISTORY:

Added

1973, No. 251

(Adj. Sess.), § 3. 1974; amended

1977, No. 205

(Adj. Sess.), § 2;

1987, No. 39

, § 2;

1989, No. 11

, § 6, eff. July 1, 1990;

1991, No. 233

(Adj. Sess.), § 2;

1995, No. 118

(Adj. Sess.), § 1;

1999, No. 53

, § 12;

1999, No. 158

(Adj. Sess.), § 17;

2007, No. 13

, § 38;

2009, No. 24

, § 9;

2013, No. 115

(Adj. Sess.), § 3.

§ 5053a.
Employees of a supervisory union.

For purposes of this section, the term “transferred employee” means an employee under this chapter who transitioned from employment solely by a school district to employment, wholly or in part, by a supervisory union pursuant to

16 V.S.A. § 261a(a)(6)

or (8)(E) as amended on June 3, 2010.

A transferred employee from a participating school district shall remain an employee of the school district solely for the purpose of employer participation and employee membership in the System regardless of whether the supervisory union is a participant in the System on the date of transition. The membership and benefits of the transferred employee shall not be impaired or reduced by either negotiations with the supervisory union or school district under 21 V.S.A. chapter 22 or otherwise.

If a supervisory union is a participant in the System on the date of transition, then:

a transferred employee from a nonparticipating district shall not become a member of the System unless, through negotiations with the supervisory union under 21 V.S.A. chapter 22, the supervisory union becomes a participant in the System on the employee’s behalf;

an existing employee of the supervisory union on the date of transition shall be a member to the extent the supervisory union is or becomes a participant in the System on the employee’s behalf; and

a new employee of the supervisory union after the date of transition shall be a member to the extent the supervisory union is or becomes a participant in the System on the employee’s behalf.

If a supervisory union is not a participant in the System on the date of transition, then:

a transferred employee from a nonparticipating district shall not be a member of the System unless, through negotiations with the supervisory union under 21 V.S.A. chapter 22, the supervisory union becomes a participant in the System on the employee’s behalf;

an existing employee of the supervisory union on the date of transition shall not be a member of the System unless, through negotiations with the supervisory union under 21 V.S.A. chapter 22, the supervisory union becomes a participant in the System on the employee’s behalf; and

a new employee of the supervisory union after the date of transition shall not be a member of the System unless, through negotiations with the supervisory union under 21 V.S.A. chapter 22, the supervisory union becomes a participant in the System on the employee’s behalf.

HISTORY:

Added

2011, No. 156

(Adj. Sess.), § 25, eff. May 16, 2012.

§ 5054.
Creditable service.

An employee who becomes a member on July 1, 1975 shall receive credit for all prior service as an employee since the employee’s most recent date of hire with his or her present employer, up to a maximum of 20 years. Any other person who becomes a member shall receive credited service for the three year period prior to joining.

All service of a member since he or she last became a member on account of which contributions are made shall be credited service.

The Retirement Board shall fix and determine by rule how much service in any year is equivalent to one year of service, but in no case shall it allow credit for a period of absence without pay of more than a month’s duration, nor shall more than one year of service be creditable for all service in one fiscal year. Service rendered as an employee for the full normal working time in any year shall be equivalent to one year’s service, but in no case shall less than the minimum number of hours established under subdivision 5051(10) of this title be regarded as full normal working time.

Any employee whose continuous service is broken and is later rehired, shall be considered as a new employee without any credit for service previously rendered.

The Retirement Board may enter into a prior service purchase agreement with any municipality which has participated in another funded retirement system to enter the Vermont Municipal Employees’ Retirement System and transfer assets from its predecessor system into the Vermont Municipal Employees’ System representing the liabilities for continuous service accrued prior to the participation effective date. Assets received by the municipality from the predecessor system shall be transferred to the Vermont Municipal Employees’ Retirement System in a lump sum. Liabilities not covered by the lump sum deposit shall be contributed by the municipal employer as an additional employer contribution rate determined in accordance with the provisions of subdivision 5064(c)(6) of this title.

The Board may enter into a prior service purchase agreement with any member who has participated in a public retirement system other than this System. A member who desires to purchase creditable service for service with a public retirement system outside this System must make application to the Board to purchase such creditable service. Upon approval by the Board, a member who desires to purchase additional creditable service must deposit in the Fund, a lump sum equal to the accrued liability (based on the assumptions and methodology adopted by the Board) for such additional creditable service. In lieu of a single payment, a member may, subject to the approval of the Board, contribute in installments of equal monthly payments (over a period not to exceed 60 months) the actuarial equivalent value (based on assumptions adopted by the Board) of the lump sum payment described in this section. Any member who terminates prior to completing all required installment payments as approved by the Board shall receive pro rata credit for service purchased before the member’s date of termination, but if so elected at the time of termination, the member may pay as much in a single sum as is necessary to provide full credit at this time. The payments made by the member pursuant to this subsection shall be treated for all purposes as member contributions. No application may be accepted for purchase of credit for prior service in a public retirement system if at the time of application the member has a vested right to retirement benefits in such public retirement system.

The Board may enter into a prior service purchase agreement with any Group B member who has participated in Group A, a Group C member who has participated in Group A or B for service in that group, a Group D member who has participated in Group A, B, or C for service in one of those groups, or an employer on behalf of a member as described in this subsection. The purchase made by a member shall follow the procedure set forth in subsection (f) of this section. The purchase made by an employer on behalf of a member shall be paid in equal annual installments over a specified period as determined by the Board.

Credit shall be granted for any period of approved absence from service due to any class of military service approved by the Retirement Board, provided the employee returns to service in the municipality within 90 days after having become discharged or separated from such military service, as if such service had been service as an employee of the municipality. The earnable compensation of the employee at the time of entering such military service shall be deemed to be the earnable compensation for the period of such service.

Credit shall also be granted for any period of absence from service in connection with an approved workers’ compensation claim as a result of a work-related injury, provided the employee provides evidence of the period covered by the approved workers’ compensation claim upon return to active service. The earnable compensation of the employee at the time of entering the period of the absence from service resulting from an approved workers’ compensation claim or the wages plus all other wage replacement compensation received while on the approved period of absence, whichever provides for the highest total compensation, shall be deemed to be the earnable compensation for the period of such service. The total compensation under this subsection shall not exceed what the earnable compensation would have been had the member not been injured.

HISTORY:

Added

1973, No. 251

(Adj. Sess.), § 3. 1974; amended

1983, No. 128

(Adj. Sess.), § 3;

1987, No. 39

, § 3;

1987, No. 183

(Adj. Sess.), § 21, eff. May 7, 1988;

1989, No. 11

, § 7;

1991, No. 233

(Adj. Sess.), §§ 3, 4;

1999, No. 61

, § 2;

2001, No. 29

, § 8;

2007, No. 13

, § 39;

2015, No. 114

(Adj. Sess.), § 8.

§ 5054a.
Elective credits.

Any member may elect to have included in the member’s creditable service, years of service as an employee of another municipality, as a State employee, or as a teacher in a public or private school, as defined by the Board, and years of service in the defined contribution plan authorized under section 5070 of this title when the employee elects to transfer back to the defined benefit plan as a result of his or her employer offering a higher group plan. Any member who so elects shall deposit in the Fund by a single contribution the amount or amounts determined by the System’s actuary to be cost neutral to the System. No application for credit under this subsection shall be granted if at the time of application, the member has a vested right to retirement benefits in another defined benefit retirement system based upon that service.

Any member who has rendered 15 years of creditable service and who has, prior to becoming a member of the System, served a minimum of one full year of full-time service in the military or one full year of full-time service as a member of the Cadet Nurse Corps in World War II, the Peace Corps, VISTA, or AmeriCorps for which the member has derived no military pension benefits, may elect to have included in the member’s creditable service all or any part of the member’s military, Cadet Nurse Corps, Peace Corps, VISTA, or AmeriCorps service not exceeding five years. Any member who so elects shall deposit in the Fund by a single contribution the amount or amounts determined by the System’s actuary to be cost-neutral to the System. Notwithstanding the foregoing, in the event of a conflict between the provisions of this subsection and the provisions of 10 U.S.C. § 12736 concerning the counting of the same full-time military service toward both military and State pensions, the provisions of the U.S. Code shall control.

Any time a member is required to make a single contribution in connection with an election under this section, a member may contribute over a maximum of five years in installments of equal value. Those contributions shall become a part of the member’s accumulated contributions. Any member who retires before completing payment for the purchase of service under this section shall receive pro rata credit for service purchased before the date of retirement, but if the member so elects at the time of retirement, the member may pay as much in a single sum as is necessary to provide full credit at that time.

HISTORY:

Added

1999, No. 53

, § 8b; amended

2001, No. 29

, § 9;

2005, No. 197

(Adj. Sess.), § 2;

2007, No. 13

, § 40;

2009, No. 24

, § 10;

2015, No. 18

, § 8.

§ 5055.
Normal and early retirement.

Normal retirement. Any member who has reached his or her normal retirement date may retire on a normal retirement allowance on the first day of any month after separation from service by filing an application in the manner outlined in subdivision (1) of this subsection. Any member in service may be retired on a normal retirement allowance on the first day of the calendar month next following his or her normal retirement date.

Where application for a retirement allowance is required, the member shall apply in writing to the Retirement Board not later than 90 days, or longer for cause shown, after the date upon which the retirement allowance is to begin.

Normal retirement allowance. Upon normal retirement, a Group A member shall receive a normal retirement allowance that shall be equal to one and four-tenths percent of his or her average final compensation multiplied by the number of years of creditable service as a Group A member up to a maximum of 60 percent of average final compensation; a Group B member shall receive a normal retirement allowance which shall be equal to the normal retirement allowance earned as a member of Group A, if any, up to a maximum of 60 percent of average final compensation, plus one and seven-tenths percent of his or her average final compensation multiplied by the number of years of creditable service as a Group B member, up to a maximum of 60 percent of average final compensation; and a Group C or Group D member who retires prior to July 1, 1995 shall receive a normal retirement allowance which shall be equal to the normal retirement allowance earned as a member of Group A, if any, up to a maximum of 60 percent of average final compensation, and that earned as a member of Group B, if any, up to a maximum of 60 percent of average final compensation, plus two and one-half percent of his or her average final compensation multiplied by the number of years of creditable service as a member of Group C, up to a maximum of 50 percent of average final compensation. The normal retirement allowance for a Group B member who is hired on or after July 1, 1999 shall be equal to the early retirement allowance earned as a member of Group A, including reductions set forth in subsection (d) or (e) of this section as appropriate, if any, plus the normal retirement allowance earned as a member of Group B. The normal retirement allowance for a Group C or Group D member who retires on or after July 1, 1995 shall be equal to the early retirement allowance earned as a member of Group A including reductions set forth in subsection (d) or (e) of this section as appropriate, if any, up to a maximum of 60 percent of average final compensation, plus the early retirement allowance earned as a member of Group B including reductions set forth in subsection (d) or (e) of this section as appropriate, if any, up to a maximum of 60 percent of average final compensation, plus the normal retirement allowance earned as a member of Group C or Group D, up to a maximum of 50 percent of average final compensation.
(b) (1) Normal retirement allowance. Upon normal retirement, a Group A member shall receive a normal retirement allowance that shall be equal to one and four-tenths percent of his or her average final compensation multiplied by the number of years of creditable service as a Group A member up to a maximum of 60 percent of average final compensation; a Group B member shall receive a normal retirement allowance which shall be equal to the normal retirement allowance earned as a member of Group A, if any, up to a maximum of 60 percent of average final compensation, plus one and seven-tenths percent of his or her average final compensation multiplied by the number of years of creditable service as a Group B member, up to a maximum of 60 percent of average final compensation; and a Group C or Group D member who retires prior to July 1, 1995 shall receive a normal retirement allowance which shall be equal to the normal retirement allowance earned as a member of Group A, if any, up to a maximum of 60 percent of average final compensation, and that earned as a member of Group B, if any, up to a maximum of 60 percent of average final compensation, plus two and one-half percent of his or her average final compensation multiplied by the number of years of creditable service as a member of Group C, up to a maximum of 50 percent of average final compensation. The normal retirement allowance for a Group B member who is hired on or after July 1, 1999 shall be equal to the early retirement allowance earned as a member of Group A, including reductions set forth in subsection (d) or (e) of this section as appropriate, if any, plus the normal retirement allowance earned as a member of Group B. The normal retirement allowance for a Group C or Group D member who retires on or after July 1, 1995 shall be equal to the early retirement allowance earned as a member of Group A including reductions set forth in subsection (d) or (e) of this section as appropriate, if any, up to a maximum of 60 percent of average final compensation, plus the early retirement allowance earned as a member of Group B including reductions set forth in subsection (d) or (e) of this section as appropriate, if any, up to a maximum of 60 percent of average final compensation, plus the normal retirement allowance earned as a member of Group C or Group D, up to a maximum of 50 percent of average final compensation.

The average final compensation used to calculate the retirement allowance under all plans shall be based on the definition of the average final compensation for the member’s group plan immediately preceding retirement.

Early retirement. Any member who has not reached his or her normal retirement date but who has completed five years of creditable service, at least two and one-half of which have been as a contributor subsequent to joining the System, and who has attained age 55 may retire on an early retirement allowance.

Early retirement allowance. Upon early retirement, a member shall receive an early retirement allowance equal to the retirement benefit reduced by one-half of one percent for each of the first 120 months, one-sixth of one percent for each of the next 120 months, one-eighteenth of one percent for each of the next 120 months, and one-fifty-fourth of one percent for each additional month that the member is under the normal age at the time of early retirement.

Early retirement allowance—police officers. Notwithstanding subsections (c) and (d) of this section, upon early retirement, sworn municipal police officers who have attained age 60 and who are members of Group A or B shall receive an early retirement allowance which shall be equal to his or her normal retirement allowance computed under subsection (b) of this section, reduced by one-quarter of one percent for each month the member is under the normal age at the time of early retirement. Municipal public safety officers who have attained age 50 and completed 20 years of creditable service and who are members of Group D may retire on an early retirement allowance. Members of Group D who retire on an early retirement allowance shall receive an early retirement allowance which shall be equal to the normal retirement allowance at age 55 for Group D service with no reduction applied, but shall have all appropriate penalties applied to accrued Group A, Group B, or Group C service.

In any fiscal year in which a beneficiary resumes service, as that term is defined in section 5051 of this title, after separation from service for a period of time to be determined by the Board, he or she shall again become a member of the System, shall contribute at the rate established for members of his or her group, and shall not be entitled to receive a retirement allowance.

Upon the subsequent retirement of an employee who once again became a member under subsection (f) of this section, the employee shall once again become a beneficiary whose former retirement allowance shall be restored, but the beneficiary shall not be entitled to cost of living adjustments for the period during which he or she was restored to service. In addition to the former retirement allowance, a beneficiary shall be entitled to a retirement allowance separately computed for the period beginning with his or her last restoration to service for which the member has made a contribution. If the beneficiary is not vested in the System since he or she was last restored to service, the member’s contributions plus accumulated interest shall be returned to him or her.

HISTORY:

Added

1973, No. 251

(Adj. Sess.), § 3. 1974; amended

1977, No. 164

(Adj. Sess.), §§ 1, 2, eff. March 31, 1978;

1987, No. 39

, § 4;

1989, No. 11

, §§ 3, 8;

1991, No. 233

(Adj. Sess.), § 5;

1995, No. 25

, § 1;

1999, No. 53

, § 9;

1995, No. 61

, § 3;

2001, No. 29

, § 10;

2001, No. 116

(Adj. Sess.), § 10, eff. May 28, 2002;

2003, No. 122

(Adj. Sess.), § 297g;

2007, No. 13

, § 41;

2007, No. 13

7 (Adj. Sess.), § 9;

2009, No. 24

, § 11.

§ 5056.
Disability retirement.

Upon application of a member not more than 90 days before, or later than 90 days, or longer for cause shown, the date a member separates from service, any member who has not reached his or her normal retirement date and has had five or more years of creditable service, may be retired by the Retirement Board on a disability retirement allowance on the first of the month following separation from service; provided that the Medical Board, after an examination of the medical records of the member or a medical examination by a physician or physicians designated by the Medical Board, shall certify that the member is mentally or physically incapacitated for the further performance of the member’s specific job requirements, that such incapacity has existed at and since the time of the member’s separation from service and is likely to be permanent, and that he or she should be retired. If the member has applied for and been granted a disability retirement allowance from the Social Security Administration prior to submission of municipal application, an automatic approval will be granted upon receipt of proof of Social Security disability allowance.

Upon a disability retirement, a member shall receive a normal retirement allowance if he or she has reached his or her normal retirement date; otherwise a member shall receive the allowance accrued to date of disability.

Notwithstanding subsection (b) of this section, a Group D member, upon ordinary disability retirement, shall receive an additional allowance which will be equal to ten percent of the member’s average final compensation for each dependent child, not in excess of three, who has not attained age 18 or, if a dependent student, has not attained age 23, if the member’s compensation from the municipality:

Is not subject to Social Security withholding; or

When added to his or her Social Security benefit, is subject to Social Security withholding.

HISTORY:

Added

1973, No. 251

(Adj. Sess.), § 3; amended

1983, No. 56

, § 2, eff. April 22, 1983;

1987, No. 39

, § 5;

1989, No. 11

, § 4; Amended

1999, No. 61

, § 7;

2005, No. 197

(Adj. Sess.), § 3.

§ 5056a.
Benefit denial; evidentiary hearing.

An applicant for disability retirement benefits under section 5056 of this title may file a request for an evidentiary hearing with the Retirement Board if the application for benefits is denied.

The hearing shall be an appeal de novo and shall be conducted by a hearing officer designated by the Board and in conformance with rules adopted by the Board. Rules adopted by the Board shall be consistent with

3 V.S.A. § 809

.

The decision of the hearing officer shall constitute final administrative action.

The Retirement System or the applicant may appeal a decision of the hearing officer to the Supreme Court pursuant to Rule 13 of the Vermont Rules of Appellate Procedure.

HISTORY:

Added

2003, No. 38

, § 7; amended

2005, No. 197

(Adj. Sess.), § 4.

§ 5057.
Reexamination of disability beneficiary.

Once each year, the Retirement Board or the Medical Board may require any disability beneficiary who has not reached his or her normal retirement date to undergo a medical examination, by a physician or physicians designated by the Medical Board, the examination to be made at the place of residence of the beneficiary or other place mutually agreed upon. In lieu of a medical examination, the Retirement Board may request current medical records or evidence to substantiate the continued disability status.

Should any disability beneficiary who has not reached his or her normal retirement date refuse to submit to such medical examination or refuse to supply current medical records or other requested medical evidence, his or her allowance may be discontinued until withdrawal of such refusal, and should refusal continue for one year, all the beneficiary’s rights in and to his or her pension may be revoked by the Retirement Board.

HISTORY:

Added

1973, No. 251

(Adj. Sess.), § 3; amended

2005, No. 197

(Adj. Sess.), § 5.